Arkansas, session 2025, SB371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 12, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-8-130. Missing endangered child advisory system.
(a) There is established a standardized system to aid in the search of
missing children who do not meet the criteria for activation of the Arkansas
Amber Alert System.
(b) The Division of Arkansas State Police shall operate the missing
endangered child advisory system created by this section.
(c) The missing endangered child advisory system shall be activated
for a child under eighteen (18) years of age under the following
circumstances:
(1) When the disappearance of the child appears to be
*CEB137*
04-03-2025 14:12:09 CEB137

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 S3/20/25 H4/3/25 SB371
unexplained, involuntary, or suspicious;
(2) When it is suspected but not confirmed that the child was
abducted;
(3) When the child has been diagnosed with a:
(A) Developmental disability or pervasive developmental
disorder; or
(B) Physical, mental, or cognitive impairment; or
(4) When the child may otherwise be in danger due to age,
health, weather conditions, presence with a potentially dangerous person, or
other circumstance.
(d) The Division of Arkansas State Police shall:
(1) Establish the procedure for activation of the missing
endangered child advisory system; and
(2) Coordinate with local law enforcement to ensure the
effective use of the missing endangered child advisory system.
(e) The missing endangered child advisory system shall only be
activated when the missing child's disappearance does not qualify for the
activation of the Arkansas Amber Alert System.

/s/J. Scott
















04-03-2025 14:12:09 CEB137